Maryland, session 2025, HB0032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 1 –

Ch. 115 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) “Committed person” means a person committed to the Health Department as
not criminally responsible under the test for criminal responsibility.
(d) “Health Department” means the Maryland Department of Health.
3–120.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “AUTHORIZED AGENT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
NOT COUNSEL FOR THE COMMITTED PERSON AND WHO IS SELECTED BY THE
COMMITTED PERSON TO REPRESENT THE INTERESTS OF THE COMMITTED PERSON
IN ALL FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD MATTERS.
(B) (1) THE HEALTH DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A FORENSIC
REVIEW BOARD AT EACH FACILITY THAT HAS CHARGE OF A COMMITTED PERSON
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD MAY MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS
RELATING TO THE RELEASE OR REHABILITATION OF A COMMITTED PERSON UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (C) EACH MEMBER OF A FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD SHALL BE A
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER LICENSED UNDER THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.
(C) (D) (1) EACH AT LEAST ONCE PER YEAR, EACH FORENSIC REVIEW
BOARD SHALL REVIEW ANNUALLY EACH COMMITTED PERSON’S ELIGIBILITY FOR
RELEASE UNDER § 3–114 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD SHALL, BY A MAJORITY VOTE OF
THE MEMBERS, DETERMINE WHETHER TO RECOMMEND TO THE COURT THAT A
COMMITTED PERSON IS ELIGIBLE FOR DISCHARGE OR CONDITIONAL RELEASE, WITH
OR WITHOUT PROPOSED CONDITIONS.
(3) (I) EACH FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD SHALL MAINTAIN A
WRITTEN RECORD CONTAINING ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS.
(II) THE WRITTEN RECORD SHALL BE INCLUDED IN THE
MEDICAL RECORD OF THE COMMITTED PERSON.
(III) THE FINDINGS SHALL INCLUDE THE REASONS FOR THE
FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD’S RECOMMENDATION AND A PLAN FOR OVERCOMING ANY
BARRIERS TO RELEASE.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 115
(4) WHEN MAKING A RECOMMENDATION UNDER THIS SECTION, A
FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD SHALL CONSIDER A WRITTEN STATEMENT OFFERED BY
THE COMMITTED PERSON TO THE FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD.
(5) THE FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE TO A
COMMITTED PERSON AND THE COUNSEL OF RECORD FOR THE COMMITTED PERSON:
(I) AT LEAST 10 DAYS BEFORE THE FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD
HOLDS A MEETING CONCERNING THE COMMITTED PERSON; AND
(II) WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD
ISSUES A RECOMMENDATION TO THE COURT.
(D) (E) (1) EACH FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD SHALL HAVE AN ODD
NUMBER OF MEMBERS.
(2) EACH MEMBER OF THE FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD SHALL HAVE
ONE VOTE.
(3) (I) A FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD MAY NOT CONDUCT A REVIEW
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) (D) OF THIS SECTION UNLESS A QUORUM IS PRESENT.
(II) A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS OF THE FORENSIC REVIEW
BOARD IS A QUORUM.
(F) (1) A COMMITTED PERSON MAY APPOINT AN AUTHORIZED AGENT TO
ATTEND THE PORTION OF A FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD MEETING CONCERNING THE
COMMITTED PERSON.
(2) AN AUTHORIZED AGENT MAY BE A SOCIAL WORKER OR A
NONLEGAL REPRESENTATIVE EMPLOYED BY THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
REPRESENTING THE COMMITTED PERSON.
(3) AN AUTHORIZED AGENT MAY ONLY GIVE AND HEAR ARGUMENTS.
(4) COUNSEL FOR ANY PARTY MAY NOT ATTEND FORENSIC REVIEW
BOARD MEETINGS.
(E) (G) (1) IF THE COMMITTED PERSON’S TREATMENT TEAM
DETERMINES THAT THE COMMITTED PERSON IS ELIGIBLE FOR DISCHARGE OR
CONDITIONAL RELEASE BEFORE THE ANNUAL REVIEW SCHEDULED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE TREATMENT TEAM SHALL NOTIFY THE
FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD IN WRITING OF THE NEED FOR A RELEASE ELIGIBILITY
REVIEW.
– 3 –

Ch. 115 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING NOTICE UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD SHALL CONDUCT A REVIEW
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE TREATMENT TEAM SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN STATEMENT
THAT INCLUDES THE CLINICAL REASONS UNDERLYING THE DETERMINATION THAT
THE COMMITTED PERSON IS ELIGIBLE FOR DISCHARGE OR CONDITIONAL RELEASE.
(4) A COPY OF THE NOTIFICATION MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION AND THE WRITTEN STATEMENT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(3) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE INCLUDED IN THE MEDICAL RECORD OF THE
COMMITTED PERSON.
(F) (H) A COPY OF A DOCUMENT OR RECORD PRODUCED BY A FORENSIC
REVIEW BOARD UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL, ON REQUEST, BE PROVIDED TO:
(1) THE COMMITTED PERSON;
(2) COUNSEL FOR THE COMMITTED PERSON;
(3) THE COURT;
(4) THE STATE’S ATTORNEY; OR
(5) THE HEALTH DEPARTMENT.
(I) THE COMMITTED PERSON’S TREATMENT TEAM SHALL IMPLEMENT
RECOMMENDATIONS, IF ANY, FROM THE FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD AND MAKE
ARRANGEMENTS FOR NECESSARY TREATMENT TO REHABILITATE THE COMMITTED
PERSON IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–706 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(J) (1) A FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD MAY APPOINT A REPRESENTATIVE TO
TESTIFY AS TO THE HEALTH DEPARTMENT’S POSITION AT A RELEASE HEARING.
(2) IF A FORENSIC REVIEW BOARD TAKES A POSITION CONTRARY TO
THE POSITION OF THE COMMITTED PERSON’S TREATMENT TEAM, THE
REPRESENTATIVE APPOINTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE A MEMBER OF
THE COMMITTED PERSON’S TREATMENT TEAM.
(K) THE HEALTH DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY
OUT THIS SECTION.
3–121.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 115
(b) (1) If a court receives a report that alleges that a committed person has
violated a condition of a conditional release, the court promptly shall:
(i) notify:
1. the Health Department;
2. counsel of record for the committed person; and
3. the State’s Attorney; and
(ii) provide the State’s Attorney with the name, address, and
telephone number of the person who reported the violation and a copy of the order for
conditional release.
(2) If the Health Department receives a report that alleges that a
committed person has violated conditional release, the Department shall:
(i) notify:
1. the court;
2. counsel of record for the committed person; and
3. the State’s Attorney; and
(ii) provide the State’s Attorney with the name, address, and
telephone number of the person who reported the violation and a copy of the order for
conditional release.
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 55. COMMUNITY FORENSIC AFTERCARE PROGRAM.
13–5501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMITTED PERSON” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–101 OF THE
CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(C) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE COMMUNITY FORENSIC AFTERCARE
PROGRAM.
– 5 –

Ch. 115 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
13–5502.
(A) THERE IS A COMMUNITY FORENSIC AFTERCARE PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO MONITOR COMMITTED PERSONS
ON CONDITIONAL RELEASE.
(C) (1) THE PROGRAM SHALL MONITOR COMMITTED PERSONS ON
CONDITIONAL RELEASE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE
COMMITTED PERSON’S MENTAL HEALTH TEAM.
(2) THE PROGRAM MAY NOT MAKE CLINICAL DECISIONS REGARDING
THE TREATMENT OF COMMITTED PERSONS.
(D) (1) AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 90 DAYS, A COMMUNITY FORENSIC
AFTERCARE MONITOR SHALL HOLD A MEETING WITH:
(I) EACH COMMITTED PERSON MONITORED BY THE PROGRAM;
AND
(II) THE MENTAL HEALTH TEAM OF THE COMMITTED PERSON.
(2) A COMMITTED PERSON MAY APPOINT AN ADVOCATE, INCLUDING
A REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE OFFICE OF THE PUBLIC DEFENDER, TO ATTEND A
MEETING HELD UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) IF THE PROGRAM RECEIVES A REPORT ALLEGING THAT A COMMITTED
PERSON HAS VIOLATED CONDITIONAL RELEASE, THE PROGRAM SHALL:
(1) MAKE THE NOTIFICATIONS REQUIRED UNDER § 3–121(B)(2)(I) OF
THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE; AND
(2) PROVIDE THE STATE’S ATTORNEY WITH THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED UNDER § 3–121(B)(2)(II) OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(F) IF THE PROGRAM RECEIVES A REQUEST FOR RECORDS, THE PROGRAM
SHALL PROVIDE THE RECORDS WITHIN 48 HOURS AFTER THE REQUEST IS RECEIVED
UNLESS THE PROGRAM IS PROHIBITED UNDER APPLICABLE FEDERAL OR STATE
LAW FROM DISCLOSING THE RECORDS TO THE REQUESTING PERSON.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE
PROGRAM.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 115
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 7 –